Utah statutes.
53A-26a-303.   Certification term -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The State Board of Education shall issue each certificate under this chapter in accordance with a three-year renewal cycle established by rule.

(b)  The State Board of Education may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the certified interpreter must show satisfactory evidence of compliance with renewal conditions established by the State Board of Education pursuant to Subsection 53A-26a-202(2).

(3)  Each certificate automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the certificate unless the certified interpreter renews it in accordance with the conditions prescribed by the State Board of Education for renewal.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 1994 General Session

